Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.007

Regulatory reform—Findings—Construction—1994 c 256.

(1) The legislature finds that the financial services industry is experiencing a period of rapid change with the development and delivery of new products and services and advances in technology.

(2) The legislature further finds it in the public interest to strengthen the regulation, supervision, and examination of business entities furnishing financial services to the people of this state and that this can be accomplished by streamlining and focusing regulation to reduce costs, increase effectiveness, and foster efficiency by eliminating requirements that are not necessary for the protection of the public.

(3) The provisions of chapter 256, Laws of 1994 should not be construed to limit the ability of the director of financial institutions to implement prudent regulation, prevent unsafe, unsound, and fraudulent practices, and undertake necessary enforcement actions to protect the public and promote the public interest.

[ 1994 c 256 s 1.]